Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204C.31, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Duties of canvassing boards. The returns from every election held in this state must be reported to a legally constituted canvassing board. The duties of each canvassing board are limited to those duties specified in sections 204C.32 to 204C.39.new text begin A canvassing board may not certify its report on the results of an election until all duties of ballot reconciliation required by section 204C.20 and postelection review required by section 206.89 are complete.new text end